California statutes. Public Resources Code
 and natural floodwater conveyance, and that enhance the overall health of each watershed for beneficial uses, including public enjoyment of recreation and education.

(f) The state has an interest in working with organizations to protect, enhance, and restore the natural, historical, cultural, educational, and recreational resources in rivers and watersheds located in the southern region of the County of San Diego.

(g) The intent of the program is to protect and preserve the health of the watershed for each river within the consortium including streams, rivers, wetlands, estuaries, and the diverse natural habitats that are home to plants and animals and that provide educational and recreational opportunities for the public to steward the region’s globally unique and diverse plants and wildlife for future generations to enjoy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 4.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32659.1.

The following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Account” means the San Diego Rivers Watershed Consortium Program Account established in the San Diego River Conservancy Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32659.8.

(b) “Consortium watershed area” means lands located within the watersheds of the Otay River, the Sweetwater River, and the parts of the Tijuana River within the state, from the headwaters of each river to the Pacific Ocean.

(c) “Program” means the San Diego Rivers Watershed Consortium Program established pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 226.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

32659.2.

The conservancy shall establish the San Diego Rivers Watershed Consortium Program to create advisory panels to work cooperatively with local public agencies and other entities to identify potential project funding, including grant funding, to be used to restore the consortium watershed area and to improve public access to public lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 4.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32659.3.

(a) The conservancy shall create an advisory panel for each watershed to offer advice, expertise, support, or service to each watershed without compensation in accordance with the following requirements:

(1) The conservancy shall solicit the names of persons to serve as members of each panel from organizations and entities representing watersheds in the consortium watershed area, and those persons shall be appointed to serve on the panel representing the area in which the organization or entity is located.

(2) The members of the advisory panels shall serve on a voluntary basis and without reimbursement from the conservancy.

(3) Each member of an advisory panel shall serve for a two-year term.

(4) A member’s service as a member of an advisory panel shall end at the time that person ceases to be employed by, or serve as a representative of, the appointing organization.

(5) Advisory panels shall meet at least twice each calendar year at one or more locations within the County of San Diego.

(6) Meetings of the advisory panels shall be open to the public and subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) In appointing members and facilitating the work of the advisory panels, the conservancy shall be subject to all laws, regulations, and general and
 specific plans of the legislative body of the city or county with geographic jurisdiction over the specified watershed areas.

(c) The conservancy shall prepare an annual report on the status of the meetings of the advisory panels, which shall be included in the executive officer of the conservancy’s report to the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 4.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32659.4.

The conservancy shall establish the following advisory panels:

(a) The Otay River Watershed Advisory Panel, comprised of the following members:

(1) A conservancy board member or the member’s designee.

(2) A representative of the City of Chula Vista, appointed by its city council.

(3) A representative of the City of Imperial Beach, appointed by its city council.

(4) A representative of the City of National City, appointed by its city council.

(5) A representative of
 the City of San Diego, appointed by its city council.

(6) A representative of the County of San Diego, appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Diego.

(7) A representative of the San Diego Regional Water Quality Control Board, appointed by that board.

(8) A representative of the Department of Parks and Recreation, appointed by the Director of Parks and Recreation.

(9) A representative of the Kumeyaay Diegueño Land Conservancy, appointed by that conservancy.

(10) A representative of a university or college in the San Diego area, appointed by the president of the university or college.

(11) A representative of
 the San Diego Unified Port District, appointed by the governing board of the port district.

(b) The Sweetwater River Watershed Advisory Panel, comprised of the following members:

(1) A conservancy board member or the member’s designee.

(2) A representative of the City of La Mesa, appointed by its city council.

(3) A representative of the City of Lemon Grove, appointed by its city council.

(4) A representative of the City of Chula Vista, appointed by its city council.

(5) A representative of the City of San Diego, appointed by its city council.

(6) A
 representative of the County of San Diego, appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Diego.

(7) A representative of the San Diego Regional Water Quality Control Board, appointed by that board.

(8) A representative of the Department of Parks and Recreation, appointed by the Director of Parks and Recreation.

(9) A representative of the Kumeyaay Diegueño Land Conservancy, appointed by the governing board of that conservancy.

(10) A representative of a university or college in the San Diego area, appointed by the president of the university or college.

(11) A representative of the San Diego Unified Port District, appointed by the governing board of the port district.

(12) A representative of the City of National City, appointed by its city council.

(13) A representative of the Sweetwater Authority, appointed by the authority.

(c) The Tijuana River Watershed Advisory Panel, comprised of the following members:

(1) A conservancy board member, or the member’s designee.

(2) A representative of the City of Imperial Beach, appointed by its city council.

(3) A representative of the City of San Diego, appointed by its city council.

(4) A representative of the County of San Diego, appointed by the Board of Supervisors of San Diego
 County.

(5) A representative of the San Diego Regional Water Quality Control Board, appointed by that board.

(6) A representative of the Department of Parks and Recreation, appointed by the Director of Parks and Recreation.

(7) A representative of the Kumeyaay Diegueño Land Conservancy, appointed by that conservancy.

(8) A representative of a university or college in the San Diego area, appointed by the president of the university or college.

(9) A representative of the San Diego Unified Port District, appointed by the governing board of the port district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 227.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

32659.5.

The advisory panels appointed pursuant to Section 32659.4 shall each prepare a strategic plan containing all of the following:

(a) A system for prioritizing each designated river watershed that shall give priority to watershedwide projects that create and expand opportunities to protect, enhance, and restore the natural, historical, cultural, educational, and recreational resources of the watershed.

(b) A summary of the policies and priorities for each river watershed.

(c) A description of each watershed identifying underused, existing public open spaces, trails, and other facilities, and recommendations of ways to provide better public
 use and enjoyment in the designated areas.

(d) A plan for implementing the program in conformance with all related general and specific plans and zoning regulations of the local and regional municipalities within each watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 4.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32659.6.

The conservancy may do all of the following in implementing the program:

(a) Undertake site improvement projects within the consortium watershed area.

(b) Provide for public access within the consortium watershed area.

(c) Provide for restoration and rehabilitation within the consortium watershed area.

(d) Undertake projects directly and award grants to public agencies, Native American Indian tribes, nonprofit organizations, and joint powers authorities to help achieve the intent of the program.

(e) Upgrade
 deteriorating facilities and construct new facilities as needed for outdoor recreation, natural education and interpretation, and resource protection within the consortium watershed area.

(f) Provide assistance to each advisory panel established pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 4.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32659.7.

Notwithstanding any other law, the conservancy shall not take any of the following actions:

(a) Exercise the power of eminent domain.

(b) Manage, regulate, or control the use of any land owned or leased by another public agency, except as provided pursuant to a written agreement with that public agency.

(c) Levy a tax.

(d) Take any action that interferes with, conflicts with, impedes, adversely impacts, or prevents the planning and implementation of projects and programs contained in adopted local or community plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 4.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32659.8.

(a) The San Diego Rivers Watershed Consortium Program Account is hereby created in the San Diego River Conservancy Fund. Moneys in the account shall accrue interest and be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the conservancy for expenditure for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) (1) All funds received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the account.

(2) The conservancy may apply for and accept grants, gifts, donations, subventions, rent, royalties, and other assistance from public and private sources on behalf of the program.

(3) The conservancy may also accept goods
 or services contributed to it by a public agency, private entity, or person and, upon receipt, may use the goods or services, for program purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 4.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32659.9.

The conservancy shall administer funds appropriated to it for the program and may expend those funds for grants, goods, services, control and removal of invasive species, capital improvements, support of the program’s operations, and to carry out the program’s intent and purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 4.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 23. SANTA MONICA MOUNTAINS CONSERVANCY [33000. - 33220.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [33000. - 33010.]

33000.

This division shall be known as and may be cited as the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the Santa Monica Mountains Zone, as defined in Section 33105, is a unique and valuable economic, environmental, agricultural, scientific, educational, and recreational resource that should be held in trust for present and future generations; that, as the last large undeveloped area contiguous to the shoreline within the greater Los Angeles metropolitan region, comprised of Los Angeles and Ventura Counties, it provides essential relief from the urban environment; that it exists as a single ecosystem in which changes that affect one part may also affect all other parts; and that the preservation and protection of this resource is in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.

The Legislature further finds and declares that prior to the preparation of the plan by the Santa Monica Mountains Comprehensive Planning Commission, planning for the zone was fragmented and there were ineffective means of determining and resolving conflicting interjurisdictional values, or of evaluating individual projects within the zone as to their effect on the entire region; that in the absence of a governmental mechanism to perform such evaluations, piecemeal development projects were occurring within the zone which resulted in the irreplaceable loss of open space and recreational resources, in the physical and biological deterioration of air, land, and water systems within the zone, and adversely affected regional life-support systems, including fish and wildlife, therefore being harmful to the needs of the present and future population of the region.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33003.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the coastal zone portion of the Santa Monica Mountains Zone has been evaluated as part of the California Coastal Zone Conservation Plan, and because of the unique, important, and threatened nature of the coastal-related resources within the coastal zone, the Legislature determined that the special coastal resources planning and management program established pursuant to the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000)) should apply within the coastal zone and that the local coastal program required by such act should be completed in a timely and effective manner by local governments and certified by the California Coastal Commission. It is the intent of the Legislature to facilitate early completion of local coastal programs for the coastal zone portion of the Santa Monica Mountains Zone and that accordingly the jurisdiction of the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy should be extended to include, at the time of certification, those portions of the coastal zone for which a local coastal program has been certified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33004.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the Santa Monica Mountains Comprehensive Planning Commission, composed of representatives of the state government, cities, and counties in the region, and the general public, has adopted a comprehensive plan for the conservation and development of the zone, consistent with the preservation of the resource as set forth in Section 33001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33005.

Federal grant funds shall be used to accomplish the purposes of this division to the maximum extent possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33006.

It is further declared to be the intent of the Legislature that, in making grants for park, recreation, or conservation purposes from funds received pursuant to Section 507(n) of the National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978 (16 U. S.C. Sec. 460kk(n)), the conservancy shall primarily operate outside the public ownership area of the Santa Monica Mountains National Recreation Area as identified by the Secretary of the Interior pursuant to Section 507(d)(2) of the National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 460kk(d)(2)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33007.

In accomplishing the objectives of this division, private landowners, local governments, and all other public agencies shall be encouraged to participate in the programs authorized by this division by voluntary incentives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33008.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there are existing problems of substandard lots, incompatible land uses, conflicts with recreational use, and inadequate resource protection which, in some cases, cannot be addressed in a feasible manner by local government exercise of the police power or federal land acquisition as part of the Santa Monica Mountains National Recreation Area, and that it is necessary to enact the provisions of this division as a complement to the full exercise of the police power by local governments and the acquisition of lands by the federal government for the Santa Monica Mountains National Recreation Area.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the people of the State of California have an interest in the protection of resources and the use of lands acquired or managed by the conservancy pursuant to this division, and that the conservancy in carrying out its duties pursuant to this division acts on behalf of the State of California.

(c) This division does not authorize the conservancy to regulate private property, nor does it supersede or limit a local government’s exercise of the police power, over private property, derived from any other provision of existing law or any law hereafter enacted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

33009.

In order to avoid the continuing problems identified in Section 33008, each local government’s implementation of the plan shall be a necessary condition of that local government receiving any money pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33010.

For purposes of compliance with federal law, the references to the Santa Monica Mountains Comprehensive Planning Commission shall be deemed to mean the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [33100. - 33105.6.]

33100.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this chapter shall govern the interpretation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33101.

“Coastal zone” means that area described in Section 30103.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33102.

“Conservancy” means the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33103.

“Fund” means the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33104.

“Plan” means the plan approved by the Secretary of the Interior pursuant to Section 507(n) of the National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. 460kk(n)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33105.

“Zone” means the Santa Monica Mountains Zone, which includes that part of the land area of the greater Los Angeles metropolitan region, landward of the Pacific Coast Highway (State Highway Route 1) bounded by Calleguas Creek, thence following Calleguas Creek northward to its intersection with the corporate boundary of Camarillo, thence following the southern boundary of the City of Camarillo eastward until it intersects the Ventura Freeway (State Highway Route 101), thence following the Ventura Freeway eastward to a point of intersection with the western boundary of the Malibu Creek Watershed. The northern boundary continues thence along the boundary of the Watershed to its intersection again with the Ventura Freeway on the east; thence eastward along this freeway to its intersection with the corporate boundary of the City of Los Angeles, thence continuing on a line drawn one-quarter of a mile south of the Ventura Freeway to its intersection with Ventura Boulevard and continuing on a line one-quarter mile south from Ventura Boulevard eastward to its intersection with Sepulveda Boulevard; thence continuing eastward along Valley Vista Boulevard to its intersection with Dixie Canyon Avenue and from this point continuing eastward on a line one-quarter mile south of Ventura Boulevard to its intersection with a linear projection of Lankershim Boulevard and thence northeasterly on this projection and continuing on Lankershim Boulevard to its intersection with Cahuenga Boulevard, thence east along Cahuenga Boulevard to its intersection with a linear projection of Barham Boulevard, and hence northeasterly along such projection and continuing upon Barham Boulevard to its intersection with the Los Angeles River, and eastward along the south bank of the Los Angeles River to its intersection with the boundary of Griffith Park, including Griffith Park, and thence following a direct line drawn southwest from the southernmost boundary point of Griffith Park to the intersection of Sunset Boulevard with the corporate boundary of the City of Los Angeles near the intersection of Sunset Boulevard and Marmount Lane, thence continuing westward following the Los Angeles corporate boundary to its intersection with the boundary of the City of Beverly Hills, thence following the northern boundary of the City of Beverly Hills until it returns to Sunset Boulevard, thence following Sunset Boulevard westward to its point of intersection with the Pacific Coast Highway (State Highway Route 1).

The zone shall also include Elysian Park and El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park and, for purposes of providing a recreational trail corridor, it shall also include hiking and equestrian trail connections and accessways between Griffith Park, Elysian Park, and El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

33105.5.

(a) For purposes of providing a recreational trail corridor, the zone shall also include hiking and equestrian trail connections and accessways generally following the Rim of the Valley Trail as identified in the Equestrian and Hiking Trails Guide of the City of Los Angeles.

(b) The executive director of the conservancy shall file with the Secretary of State a map specifically delineating a feasible recreational trail corridor as identified in subdivision (a) by July 1, 1984.

(c) The executive director of the conservancy shall submit the map prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) to the Assembly Committee on Water, Parks, and Wildlife and to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources at least 30 days prior to taking any action for the purposes of this section pursuant to Section 33203.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 674, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

33105.6.

The recreational trail corridor for the Rim of the Valley Trail shall include the Santa Clarita Woodlands portion of the Santa Susana Mountains. The executive director of the conservancy shall file a map with the Secretary of State by March 1, 1990, showing the revised trail corridor boundary including the Santa Clarita Woodlands. The boundaries of the addition to the trail corridor shall substantially conform to the boundaries of the Santa Clarita Woodlands depicted in the map included in the Preliminary Study of Possible Parkland Acquisition in the Santa Susana Mountains (March 1, 1989) by the Department of Parks and Recreation. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to inhibit the development of facilities necessary for the protection of public health and safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Establishment and Functions of the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy [33200. - 33215.]

33200.

(a) The Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy is hereby established within the Natural Resources Agency. The conservancy is composed of nine voting members and three ex officio members. The voting members are as follows:

(1) The Superintendent of the Santa Monica Mountains National Recreation Area, or his or her designee.

(2) A member representing the City of Los Angeles, appointed by the mayor with the approval of the city council.

(3) Three public members who shall be residents of either the County of Los Angeles or the County of Ventura, one of whom shall be appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be
 appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. At least one of the public members shall reside within the San Fernando Valley statistical area, as defined in Section 11093 of the Government Code. The seat of a public member shall be deemed vacant if the member changes his or her residence to a county other than Los Angeles or Ventura County.

(4) An elected official who is a representative nominated by the city councils of those cities which have at least 75 percent of their areas within the zone who shall be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles or a member appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles, or that member’s designee.

(5) An elected
 official who is either a member of the City Council of the City of Thousand Oaks or a member of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Ventura and who shall be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Ventura, or the elected official’s designee.

(6) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency or an employee of the agency designated by the secretary.

(7) The Superintendent of the Angeles District of the Department of Parks and Recreation, or his or her designee.

(b) (1) (A) The California Coastal Commission and the State Coastal Conservancy shall each appoint an ex
 officio member who shall be either a member or employee of their respective agency. The ex officio member appointed by the California Coastal Commission and the State Coastal Conservancy shall be nonvoting members, except that the ex officio member appointed by the State Coastal Conservancy may vote on any matter relating to a project undertaken within the coastal zone portion of the zone.

(B) On the 10th working day after certification pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 20 of any local coastal program, or any portion thereof, for any portion of the zone, the ex officio member appointed by the California Coastal Commission may vote on any matter relating to a project undertaken within the coastal zone portion of the zone and the ex officio member appointed by the State Coastal Conservancy may not vote on
 the matter.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the Supervisor of the Angeles National Forest shall also serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the conservancy.

(B) The Supervisor of the Angeles National Forest may vote on a matter relating to a project located within, adjacent to, or substantially affecting, the Angeles National Forest.

(c) The chairperson and vice chairperson of the conservancy shall be selected by the voting members of the conservancy for a one-year term. A majority of the total authorized and appointed voting membership of the conservancy constitutes a quorum for the transaction of any business under this division.

(d) (1) The following members of the conservancy shall be compensated for attendance at regular meetings of the conservancy at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) per day:

(A) The public members.

(B) The member appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles or that member’s designee, unless the member or designee is also a member of the board of supervisors, in which case no compensation shall be paid.

(C) The member appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Ventura or that member’s designee, unless the member or designee is also a member of a board of supervisors, in which case no compensation shall be paid.

(D) The members appointed by the State Coastal Conservancy and the California Coastal Commission if these members are not employees of their respective agency or are not full-time compensated elected officials.

(E) The appointed member representing the City of Los Angeles.

(2) All members of the conservancy shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 211, Sec. 1.   (SB 238)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

33200.1.

Three Members of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and three Members of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with the conservancy on a regular basis and participate in its activities, to the extent that such participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 991, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

33200.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, placement of the conservancy within the Resources Agency shall not confer upon the Secretary of the Resources Agency any authority to approve or deny specific projects proposed to be undertaken by the conservancy, except pursuant to his or her membership in the conservancy as provided in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 33200, nor shall it restrict the conservancy from carrying out the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1304, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33201.

(a) The State Coastal Conservancy, pursuant to Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000), has the prime responsibility for carrying out projects identified in certified local coastal programs for jurisdictions within the coastal zone portion of the zone, and the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy has the prime responsibility pursuant to this division to undertake projects within the coastal zone portion of the zone that implement the park, recreation, conservation, and open-space provisions of the plan.

(b) This section does not affect any project undertaken by the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy or the State Coastal Conservancy prior to January 1, 1983, nor shall this section be construed to affect the existing review and approval powers of the California Coastal Commission.

(c) The State Coastal Conservancy does not have jurisdiction in the zone outside the coastal zone portion of the zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 598.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

33202.

The conservancy may apply for grants from any source to be used for the purposes of this division, and shall apply for all grants authorized pursuant to Section 507 of the National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. 460kk). The proceeds of such grants shall be deposited in the separate federal grant account in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33202.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “encroachment” means any unauthorized or unlawful interference with, or physical intrusion onto, or alteration of, the conservancy’s property, either above ground or below, including, but not limited to, buildings, walls, driveways, patios, swimming pools, gutters, and irrigation lines.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 33203 or any other provision of this division, the conservancy’s acquisition of real property or interest therein initiated after January 1, 2021, to address or resolve an encroachment on real property owned by the conservancy pursuant to this division is not subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), unless the
 value of the real property or interest therein exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per lot or parcel, as adjusted for annual changes to the Consumer Price Index for the State of California, as calculated by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. However, the conservancy may request the State Public Works Board to review and approve specific acquisitions.

(c) Nothing contained in subdivision (b) shall apply to the exercise of the power of eminent domain pursuant to this division.

(d) At least 45 days prior to the conservancy taking action pursuant to subdivision (b), the executive director of the conservancy shall provide written notice of the proposed acquisition of real property or of any interest in real property to both of the following:

(1) (A) Adjacent landowners, as
 indicated in the appropriate county tax roll.

(B) If an adjacent landowner objects to the proposed action, the conservancy shall hold a noticed public hearing on the objection to the acquisition before voting to recommend an action by the conservancy.

(2) (A) The city council of the city in which the real property is located or to the board of supervisors of the county in which the real property is located if the real property is located in an unincorporated area.

(B) If the city council or county board of supervisors votes to oppose the proposed action, the conservancy shall hold a noticed public hearing on the objection to the acquisition before voting to recommend an action by the conservancy.

(e) The value of the real property
 or interest therein subject to acquisition pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be determined by an independent third-party appraisal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

33203.

The conservancy may acquire, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 33207.5 and the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), real property or any interests therein, including development rights and easements for all the purposes specified in this division. For purposes of this section, the State Public Works Board may use the power of eminent domain. Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the Director of General Services, when so requested by the conservancy and when the conservancy finds it necessary to meet the provisions of this division, shall, without delay, lease, rent, sell, transfer, or exchange any land or interests therein acquired pursuant to this division. Any moneys received by the state, upon disposition of lands acquired pursuant to this division, shall be deposited in the fund and shall be available for the purposes of this division.

The Department of General Services and the conservancy shall jointly develop and implement appropriate procedures to insure that land acquisitions, options to purchase, land disposals, and other property transactions under this division are carried out efficiently, equitably, and with proper notice to the public.

The conservancy may coordinate with the Department of Parks and Recreation any acquisition with park and recreation development potential and may contract with the Department of Parks and Recreation as necessary in order to do so.

The conservancy may, by interagency agreement, cooperate with resource conservation districts in order to carry out the purposes and objectives of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1616, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

33203.1.

Notwithstanding Section 33203 or any other provision of this division, the executive director of the conservancy shall give notice of any proposed acquisition of real property, or of any interest in real property, by eminent domain to the city council of the city in which the property is located, or to the board of supervisors of the county in which the property is located if it is in an unincorporated area, at least 45 days prior to the conservancy requesting any action by the State Public Works Board pursuant to Section 15854 of the Government Code. If the city council or board of supervisors disapproves of the proposed action, the conservancy shall hold a noticed public hearing on the objections to the use of eminent domain prior to any vote recommending that action by the State Public Works Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1048, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1985.   Operative January 1, 1986, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1048.)
-------------------------------------------

33203.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the conservancy may acquire and improve real property, or any interests therein, anywhere within the zone upon a finding that the action is consistent with the plan. If the proposed acquisition or improvement is within the coastal zone, the executive director of the conservancy shall submit the proposal to the State Coastal Conservancy for review at least 60 days prior to approval by the conservancy. If the State Coastal Conservancy has not, within 60 days from the date of submission, acted to disapprove the proposed acquisition or improvement on the grounds that the project is in conflict with or would jeopardize an approved project of the State Coastal Conservancy or a proposed project as identified in a written preproject feasibility report as adopted by the State Coastal Conservancy, the acquisition or improvement may proceed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1616, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

33204.

The conservancy may, in accordance with the priorities of the plan, do the following:

(a) Award grants or make interest-free loans to cities, counties, resource conservation districts, and recreation and park districts for the purpose of restoring areas which, because of scattered ownerships, poor lot layout, inadequate lot size, inadequate park and open space, incompatible land uses, or other conditions, are adversely affecting the Santa Monica Mountains environment or are impeding orderly development. Any funds over and above eligible project costs which remain after completion of a restoration under this subdivision shall be transmitted by the city, county, resource conservation district, or recreation and park district, as the case may be, to the state and deposited in the fund and shall be available for expenditure, when appropriated by the Legislature, for the purposes of funding the programs specified in this division.

(b) Undertake, or award grants or make interest-free loans to any state agency, city, county, resource conservation district, or recreation and park district for the purposes of undertaking, the acquisition of critically needed buffer zones to ensure that the character and intensity of development surrounding lands acquired by the federal government as part of the Santa Monica Mountains National Recreation Area is generally compatible with, and does not adversely impact, the recreational and natural resource values of the national recreation area. In the acquisition of interests pursuant to this subdivision, the conservancy shall place principal reliance on acquisition of development rights and other less than fee interests.
